District of Columbia statutes.
44-109.05

Medication administration.

(a)

Licensed nurses, physicians, physician assistants, and TMEs may administer medications to residents or assist residents with taking their medications.

(b)

(1)

Each resident shall be identified prior to drug administration.

(2)

Drugs prescribed for one resident shall not be administered to another resident.

(3)

The TME shall report drug errors to the healthcare practitioner or licensed nurse and shall document the incident in the resident’s record.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 905, 47 DCR 2647